Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NORTHERN LIGHTS EXPRESS PASSENGER RAIL; PROHIBITION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "Northern Lights Express project" means the proposed high-speed passenger rail project between the cities of Minneapolis and Duluth. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner of transportation. new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation must not expend any money for studying, planning, engineering, design, land acquisition, or construction for the Northern Lights Express project. This prohibition includes grants to other entities and the expenditure of federal money for this purpose. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Metropolitan Council. new text end new text begin The Metropolitan Council must not expend any money for studying, planning, engineering, design, land acquisition, or construction for the Northern Lights Express project. This prohibition includes grants to other entities and the expenditure of federal money for this purpose. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE; APPLICATION. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. Subdivision 3 applies in the counties of Anoka, Carver, Dakota, Hennepin, Ramsey, Scott, and Washington. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION CANCELLATION; NORTHERN LIGHTS EXPRESS.new text end new text begin The uncommitted balance of the appropriation in fiscal year 2024 under Laws 2023, chapter 68, article 1, section 2, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), for the Minneapolis-Duluth Northern Lights Express intercity passenger rail project, estimated to be $194,413,803, is canceled to the general fund on the effective date of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin TRANSFER; TRUNK HIGHWAY FUND.new text end new text begin The commissioner of transportation must determine a transfer amount that equals the amount canceled under section 2, and must transfer that amount in fiscal year 2025 from the general fund to the trunk highway fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end